Illinois, session 104th, SB3077.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Personnel Code is amended by changing 5Section 8b.7 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 415/8b.7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 63b108b.7)7    Sec. 8b.7. Veteran preference. For the granting of 8appropriate preference to qualified veterans, persons who have 9been members of the armed forces of the United States or to 10qualified persons who, while citizens of the United States, 11were members of the armed forces of allies of the United States 12in time of hostilities with a foreign country, and to certain 13other persons as set forth in this Section.14    (a) As used in this Section:15        (1) "Time of hostilities with a foreign country" means 16    any period of time in the past, present, or future during 17    which a declaration of war by the United States Congress 18    has been or is in effect or during which an emergency 19    condition has been or is in effect that is recognized by 20    the issuance of a Presidential proclamation or a 21    Presidential executive order and in which the armed forces 22    expeditionary medal or other campaign service medals are 23    awarded according to Presidential executive order.  SB3077- 2 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1        (2) "Armed forces of the United States" means the 2    United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine 3    Corps, and Coast Guard. Service in the Merchant Marine 4    that constitutes active duty under Section 401 of federal 5    Public Law 95-202 shall also be considered service in the 6    Armed Forces of the United States for purposes of this 7    Section. 8        (3) "Veteran" means a member of the armed forces of 9    the United States, the Illinois National Guard, or a 10    reserve component of the armed forces of the United 11    States. 12        (4) "Active service" means full-time service as a 13    member of the armed forces of the United States, the 14    Illinois National Guard, or a reserve component of the 15    armed forces of the United States. "Active service" 16    includes full-time service as a member of the Illinois 17    National Guard or a reserve component of the armed forces 18    of the United States for active duty training, inactive 19    duty training, or other purposes. "Active service" also 20    includes full-time service as a member of the Illinois 21    National Guard in service to the State of Illinois.22        (5) "Full-time service" means any duty, service, or 23    employment as a member of the armed forces of the United 24    States, the Illinois National Guard, or a reserve 25    component of the armed forces of the United States for at 26    least 6 hours in a day or at least 30 hours in a week.  SB3077- 3 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1    (b) The preference granted under this Section shall be in 2the form of points, or the equivalent, added to the applicable 3scores of the persons if they otherwise qualify and are 4entitled to be considered for appointment.5    (c) A veteran is qualified for a preference of 10 points if 6the veteran currently holds proof of a service connected 7disability from the United States Department of Veterans 8Affairs or an allied country or if the veteran is a recipient 9of the Purple Heart.10    (d) A veteran who has served during a time of hostilities 11with a foreign country is qualified for a preference of 5 12points if the veteran served under one or more of the following 13conditions:14        (1) the The veteran served during a time of 15    hostilities with a foreign country for a total of at least 16    6 months; , or17        (2) the The veteran served during a time of 18    hostilities with a foreign country for the duration of 19    hostilities regardless of the length of engagement; , or20        (3) the The veteran served during a time of 21    hostilities with a foreign country and was discharged on 22    the basis of hardship; , or23        (4) the The veteran served during a time of 24    hostilities with a foreign country and was released from 25    active duty because of a service connected disability and 26    was discharged under honorable conditions; or  SB3077- 4 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1        (5) the veteran served in active service for a total 2    consecutive or non-consecutive period of at least 3 years 3    or 1,095 days.4    (e) A person not eligible for a preference under 5subsection (c) or (d) is qualified for a preference of 3 points 6if the person has served in the armed forces of the United 7States, the Illinois National Guard, or any reserve component 8of the armed forces of the United States if the person: (1) 9served for at least 6 months and has been discharged under 10honorable conditions; (2) has been discharged on the ground of 11hardship; (3) was released from active duty because of a 12service connected disability; or (4) served a minimum of 4 13years in the Illinois National Guard or reserve component of 14the armed forces of the United States regardless of whether or 15not the person was mobilized to active duty. An active member 16of the National Guard or a reserve component of the armed 17forces of the United States is eligible for the preference if 18the member meets the service requirements of this subsection 19(e).20    (f) The augmented ratings shall be used when determining 21the rank order of persons to be appointed.22    (g) Employees in positions covered by jurisdiction B who, 23while in good standing, leave to engage in military service 24during a period of hostility, shall be given credit for 25seniority purposes for time served in the armed forces.26    (h) A surviving unremarried spouse of a veteran who   SB3077- 5 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1suffered a service connected death or the spouse of a veteran 2who suffered a service connected disability that prevents the 3veteran from qualifying for civil service employment shall be 4entitled to the same preference to which the veteran would 5have been entitled under this Section.6    (i) A preference shall also be given to the following 7individuals: 10 points for one parent of an unmarried veteran 8who suffered a service connected death or a service connected 9disability that prevents the veteran from qualifying for civil 10service employment. The first parent to receive a civil 11service appointment shall be the parent entitled to the 12preference.13    (j) The Department of Central Management Services shall 14adopt rules and implement procedures to verify that any person 15seeking a preference under this Section is entitled to the 16preference. A person seeking a preference under this Section 17shall provide documentation or execute any consents or other 18documents required by the Department of Central Management 19Services or any other State department or agency to enable the 20department or agency to verify that the person is entitled to 21the preference.22    (k) If an applicant claims to be a veteran, the Department 23of Central Management Services must verify that status before 24granting a veteran preference by requiring a certified copy of 25the applicant's most recent DD214 (Certificate of Release or 26Discharge from Active Duty), NGB-22 (Proof of National Guard   SB3077- 6 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1Service), or other evidence of the applicant's most recent 2honorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States 3that is determined to be acceptable by the Department of 4Central Management Services.5(Source: P.A. 103-108, eff. 6-27-23; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    Section 10. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is 7amended by changing Sections 1 and 2 as follows: 8    (330 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3081)9    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Military veteran" means an Illinois resident who meets 11one or more of the following: 12        (1) served on active duty with the armed forces of the 13    United States and whose last discharge from the service 14    was honorable or general under honorable conditions; 15        (2) was discharged or released from active duty with 16    the armed forces of the United States because of a 17    service-connected disability; or 18        (3) is an active or former member of the Illinois 19    National Guard or any reserve component of the armed 20    forces of the United States and who, if applicable, was 21    discharged or separated under conditions other than 22    dishonorable. 23    "Veteran service organization" means a post, ship, camp, 24chapter, or detachment of a congressionally chartered or state   SB3077- 7 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1chartered organization that (i) is formed by and for veterans, 2(ii) has a paid membership of at least 15 individuals, and 3(iii) provides responsible aid, assistance, or services to the 4veteran community. 5    "Administrator of military veterans assistance" means the 6commanders of the various veteran service organizations, the 7superintendent of a County Veterans Assistance Commission, or 8other persons whose duty it is, under the existing statutes, 9to care for, relieve or maintain, wholly or in part, any person 10who may be entitled to such assistance under the statutes of 11the State of Illinois. This Act shall not infringe upon the 12mandated powers and authorities vested in the Illinois 13Department of Veterans Affairs.14(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    (330 ILCS 45/2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3082)16    Sec. 2. The purpose of this Act is, in part, to provide, in 17accordance with this Section, just and necessary assistance 18and services to military veterans who served in the Armed 19Forces of the United States, including active or former 20members of the Illinois National Guard or any reserve 21component of the armed forces of the United States and whose 22last discharge from the service was honorable or general under 23honorable conditions, to their families, and to the families 24of deceased veterans with service who need such assistance and 25services. The following actions shall be taken in support of   SB3077- 8 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1that purpose:2        (1) The supervisor of general assistance or the county 3    board shall provide such sums of money as may be just and 4    necessary to be drawn by the commander, quartermaster or 5    commandant of any veterans service organization, in the 6    city or town, or the superintendent of any Veterans' 7    Assistance Commission of the county, upon the 8    recommendation of the assistance committee of that 9    veterans service organization or Veterans' Assistance 10    Commission.11            (A) Funding for Veterans Assistance Commissions 12        may be derived from 3 sources, if applicable: 13                (i) a tax levied under Section 5-2006 of the 14            Counties Code and Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois 15            Public Aid Code;16                (ii) funds from the county general corporate 17            fund; and18                (iii) State funds from the Department of Human 19            Services. 20            (B) The minimum amount to be provided annually to 21        Veterans Assistance Commissions is provided in Section 22        12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, unless the 23        delegates of the County Veterans Assistance Commission 24        determine that a lesser amount covers the just and 25        necessary sums. 26        (2) If any supervisor of general assistance or county   SB3077- 9 -LRB104 19225 BDA 32671 b1    board fails or refuses after such recommendation to 2    provide just and necessary sums of money for such 3    assistance, then the veteran service organization or the 4    superintendent of any Veterans' Assistance Commission 5    located in the district of such supervisor of general 6    assistance or such county board shall apply to the circuit 7    court of the district or county for relief by mandamus 8    upon the supervisor of general assistance or county board 9    requiring him, her or it to pay, or to appropriate and pay 10    such sums of money, and upon proof made of the justice and 11    necessity of the claim, the circuit court shall grant the 12    sums so requested. 13        (3) Such sums of money shall be drawn in the manner now 14    provided under Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code and 15    Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. Orders 16    of commanders, quartermasters, commandants, or 17    superintendents of those veterans service organizations or 18    those Veterans' Assistance Commissions shall be proper 19    warrants for the expenditure of such sums of money.20(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)